Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-819
Violations; jurisdiction; powers of courts.

The several courts of record of this state having equity jurisdiction are hereby invested with jurisdiction to prevent and restrain all violations of sections 59-801 to 59-831 and especially the offering, granting, giving, soliciting, accepting, or receiving any such rebate, concession, or service by any person or persons and to prevent or restrain any such joint-stock company, corporation, limited liability company, association, or combination which has solicited, accepted, or received any such rebate, concession, or service or which has offered, granted, or given any special prices, inducements, or advantages in order to restrict or destroy competition in particular localities from engaging in commerce within this state. Such proceedings may be by way of complaint setting forth the cause of action and praying that the acts hereby made unlawful shall be enjoined or otherwise prohibited. When the parties complained of are duly notified of such complaint, the court shall proceed as soon as may be to the hearing and determination of the case, and upon such complaint and before final decree the court may at any time make such temporary restraining order or prohibition as shall be deemed just. The court may retain jurisdiction of the case after the decree for the purpose of such subsequent modification of the same as may be made to appear equitable and just in the premises.

Laws 1905, c. 162, § 16, p. 643;

R.S.1913, § 4060;

C.S.1922, § 3463;

C.S.1929, § 59-816;

R.S.1943, § 59-819;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 373;

Laws 2002, LB 1278, § 8.